Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1803.   Statutes of limitations.

(1)  An action described in Subsection 63G-6a-1802(5) shall be commenced within six months after the person bringing the action knew or should have known of the circumstances upon which the action is based.

(2)  The statutory limitations on an action between private persons on a contract or for breach of contract shall apply to any action commenced pursuant to Subsection

63G-6a-1802(5).



Amended by Chapter 91, 2012 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

